Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 10.1-1402.04.
Closure of certain coal combustion residuals units; Giles and Russell Counties.

For the purposes of this section:“Carrying cost” means the cost associated with financing expenditures incurred but not yet recovered from the electric utility’s customers and shall be calculated by applying the electric utility’s weighted average cost of debt and equity capital, as determined by the State Corporation Commission, with no additional margin or profit, to any unrecovered balances.“CCR landfill” means an area of land or an excavation that receives CCR and is not a surface impoundment, underground injection well, salt dome formation, salt bed formation, underground or surface coal mine, or cave and that is owned or operated by an electric utility.“CCR surface impoundment” means a natural topographic depression, man-made excavation, or diked area that (i) is designed to hold an accumulation of CCR and liquids; (ii) treats, stores, or disposes of CCR; and (iii) is owned or operated by an electric utility.“CCR unit” means any CCR landfill, CCR surface impoundment, lateral expansion of a CCR unit, or combination of two or more such units that is owned by an electric utility. Notwithstanding the provisions of 40 C.F.R. Part 257, “CCR unit” also includes any CCR below the unit boundary of the CCR landfill or CCR surface impoundment.“Coal combustion residuals” or “CCR” means fly ash, bottom ash, boiler slag, and flue gas desulfurization materials generated from burning coal for the purpose of generating electricity by an electric utility.“Commission” means the State Corporation Commission.“Encapsulated beneficial use” means a beneficial use of CCR that binds the CCR into a solid matrix and minimizes its mobilization into the surrounding environment.The definitions in this subsection shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with 40 C.F.R. Part 257, except as expressly provided in this section.

The owner or operator of any CCR unit located in Giles County or Russell County at the Glen Lyn Plant and the Clinch River Plant shall, if all CCR units at such plant ceased receiving CCR and submitted notification of completion of a final cap to the Department prior to January 1, 2019, complete post-closure care and any required corrective action of such unit. If all CCR units at such plant have not submitted notification of completion of a final cap to the Department prior to January 1, 2019, the owner or operator shall close all CCR units at such plant by (i) removing all of the CCR in accordance with applicable standards established by Virginia Solid Waste Management Regulations (9VAC20-81) and (ii) either (a) beneficially reusing all such CCR in a recycling process for encapsulated beneficial use or (b) disposing of the CCR in a permitted landfill on the property upon which the CCR unit is located, adjacent to the property upon which the CCR unit is located, or off of the property on which the CCR unit is located, that includes, at a minimum, a composite liner and leachate collection system that meets or exceeds the federal Criteria for Municipal Solid Waste Landfills pursuant to 40 C.F.R. Part 258. The owner or operator shall beneficially reuse CCR removed from its CCR unit if beneficial use of such removed CCR is anticipated to reduce costs incurred under this section.

The owner or operator shall complete the closure of any such CCR unit required by this section no later than 15 years after initiating the excavation process at that CCR unit. During the closure process, the owner or operator shall, at its expense, offer to provide a connection to a municipal water supply, or where such connection is not feasible provide water testing, for any residence within one-half mile of the CCR unit.

Where closure pursuant to this section requires that CCR that has been beneficially reused be removed off-site, the owner or operator shall develop a transportation plan in consultation with any county, city, or town in which the CCR units are located and any county, city, or town within two miles of the CCR units that minimizes the impact of any transport of CCR on adjacent property owners and surrounding communities. The transportation plan shall include (i) alternative transportation options to be utilized, including rail and barge transport, if feasible, in combination with other transportation methods necessary to meet the closure timeframe established in subsection C and (ii) plans for any transportation by truck, including the frequency of truck travel, the route of truck travel, and measures to control noise, traffic impact, safety, and fugitive dust caused by such truck travel. Once such transportation plan is completed, the owner or operator shall post it on a publicly accessible website. The owner or operator shall provide notice of the availability of the plan to the Department and the chief administrative officers of the consulting localities and shall publish such notice once in a newspaper of general circulation in such locality.

The owner or operator of any CCR unit subject to the provisions of subsection B shall accept and review proposals for the encapsulated beneficial use of CCR pursuant to the provisions of subsection B every four years beginning July 1, 2023. Any entity submitting such a proposal shall provide information from which the owner or operator can determine (i) the amount of CCR that will be utilized for encapsulated beneficial use; (ii) the cost of the proposed beneficial use of such CCR; and (iii) the guaranteed timeframe in which the CCR will be utilized.

In conducting closure activities described in subsection B, the owner or operator shall (i) identify options for utilizing local workers; (ii) consult with the Commonwealth’s Chief Workforce Development Officer on opportunities to advance the Commonwealth’s workforce goals, including furtherance of apprenticeship and other workforce training programs to develop the local workforce; and (iii) give priority to the hiring of local workers.

No later than October 1, 2023, and no less frequently than every two years thereafter until closure of or corrective action at all of its CCR units is complete, the owner or operator of any CCR unit subject to the provisions of subsection B shall compile the following two reports:

A report describing the owner’s or operator’s closure plan for all such CCR units; the closure progress to date, both per unit and in total; a detailed accounting of the amounts of CCR that have been and are expected to be beneficially reused from such units, both per unit and in total; a detailed accounting of the amounts of CCR that have been and are expected to be landfilled from such units, both per unit and in total; a detailed accounting of the utilization of transportation options and a transportation plan as required by subsection D; and a discussion of groundwater and surface water monitoring results and any corrective actions or other measures taken to address such results as closure is being completed.

A report that contains the proposals and analysis for proposals required by subsection E.The owner or operator shall post each such report on a publicly accessible website and shall submit each such report to the Governor, the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, the Chairman of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor, the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, and the Director.

All costs associated with closure by removal of a CCR unit or encapsulated beneficial use of CCR material in accordance with subsection B shall be recoverable through a rate adjustment clause authorized by the Commission under the provisions of subdivision A 5 e of § 56-585.1, provided that (i) when determining the reasonableness of such costs the Commission shall not consider closure in place of the CCR unit as an option; (ii) the annual revenue requirement recoverable through a rate adjustment clause authorized under this section, exclusive of any other rate adjustment clauses approved by the Commission under the provisions of subdivision A 5 e of § 56-585.1, shall not exceed $40 million on a Virginia jurisdictional basis for the Commonwealth in any 12-month period, provided that any under-recovery amount of revenue requirements incurred in excess of $40 million in a given 12-month period, limited to the under-recovery amount and the carrying cost, shall be deferred and recovered through the rate adjustment clause over up to three succeeding 12-month periods without regard to this limitation, and with the length of the amortization period being determined by the Commission; (iii) costs may begin accruing on July 1, 2020, but no approved rate adjustment clause charges shall be included in customer bills until July 1, 2022; (iv) any such costs shall be allocated to all customers of the utility in the Commonwealth as a non-bypassable charge, irrespective of the generation supplier of any such customer; and (v) any such costs that are allocated to the utility’s system customers outside of the Commonwealth that are not actually recovered from such customers shall be included for cost recovery from jurisdictional customers in the Commonwealth through the rate adjustment clause.

Any electric public utility subject to the requirements of this section may, without regard for whether it has petitioned for any rate adjustment clause pursuant to subdivision A 5 e of § 56-585.1, petition the Commission for approval of a plan for CCR unit closure at any or all of its CCR unit sites listed in subsection B. Any such plan shall take into account site-specific conditions and shall include proposals to beneficially reuse CCR from the sites if beneficial use is anticipated to reduce the costs allocated to customers. The Commission shall issue its final order with regard to any such petition within six months of its filing, and in doing so shall determine whether the utility’s plan for CCR unit closure, and the projected costs associated therewith, are reasonable and prudent, taking into account that closure in place of any CCR unit is not to be considered as an option. The Commission shall not consider plans that do not comply with subsection B.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require additional beneficial reuse of CCR at any active coal-fired electric generation facility if such additional beneficial reuse results in a net increase in truck traffic on the public roads of the locality in which the facility is located as compared with such traffic during calendar year 2019.

The Commonwealth shall not authorize any cost recovery by an owner or operator subject to the provisions of this section for any fines or civil penalties resulting from violations of federal and state law or regulation.

History.

2020, c. 563; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and Historic” in subsection G in the last paragraph.

§ 10.1-1402.1.
Permit fee regulations.

Regulations promulgated by the Board which establish a permit fee assessment and collection system pursuant to subdivisions 15a, 15b and 16 of §

10.1-1402

shall be governed by the following:

Permit fees charged an applicant shall reflect the average time and complexity of processing a permit in each of the various categories of permits and permit actions. No fees shall be charged for minor modifications or minor amendments to such permits. For purposes of this subdivision, “minor permit modifications” or “minor amendments” means specific types of changes, defined by the Board, that are made to keep the permit current with routine changes to the facility or its operation and that do not require extensive review. A minor permit modification or amendment does not substantially alter permit conditions, increase the size of the operation, or reduce the capacity of the facility to protect human health or the environment.

When promulgating regulations establishing permit fees, the Board shall take into account the permit fees charged in neighboring states and the importance of not placing existing or prospective industries in the Commonwealth at a competitive disadvantage.

On January 1, 1993, and January 1 of every even-numbered year thereafter, the Board shall evaluate the implementation of the permit fee program and provide this evaluation in writing to the Senate Committees on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and Finance; and the House Committees on Appropriations, Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, and Finance. This evaluation shall include a report on the total fees collected, the amount of general funds allocated to the Department, the Department’s use of the fees and the general funds, the number of permit applications received, the number of permits issued, the progress in eliminating permit backlogs, and the timeliness of permit processing.

Fees collected pursuant to subdivisions 15a, 15b or 16 of §

10.1-1402

shall not supplant or reduce in any way the general fund appropriation to the Board.

These permit fees shall be collected in order to recover a portion of the agency’s costs associated with (i) the processing of an application to issue, reissue, amend or modify permits, which the Board has authority to issue for the purpose of more efficiently and expeditiously processing and maintaining permits and (ii) the inspections necessary to assure the compliance of large quantity generators of hazardous waste. The fees shall be exempt from statewide indirect costs charged and collected by the Department of Accounts.

History.

1992, c. 853; 2002, c. 822; 2004, cc. 249, 324.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 822, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2004, cc. 249 and 324, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of §

10.1-1402.1

shall expire on July 1, 2004.” The section is set out above without the amendments made by Acts 2002, c. 822.

Acts 2004, cc. 249 and 324, cls. 3 through 7 provide:

“3. That the regulations adopted by the State Air Pollution Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board, and the State Water Control Board to initially implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia and shall become effective upon filing with the Registrar of Regulations. Thereafter, any amendments to the fee schedule shall not be exempted from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.).

“4. That it is the General Assembly’s intent that the Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) shall evaluate and implement measures to improve the long-term effectiveness and efficiency of its programs in ensuring the Commonwealth’s air quality, water quality and land resources are protected and to ensure the maximum value from the funding provided for the Commonwealth’s environmental programs. To assist DEQ in accomplishing such goals, a management efficiency peer review shall be conducted of the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit programs and the air permit program implemented by the agency. The review shall evaluate (i) operational changes that would improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the agency’s operations, (ii) ways to reduce the costs of compliance, and (iii) the adequacy and appropriateness of staffing levels to meet state and federal requirements. The review shall be led by a consulting firm with expertise and previous experience in conducting similar reviews of state agencies and private firms and shall include a peer review team appointed by the Director of DEQ, consisting of individuals familiar with the permit program including, but not limited to, persons nominated by the Virginia Association of Counties, the Virginia Chemistry Council, the Virginia Manufacturers Association, the Virginia Municipal League, the Hampton Roads Planning District Commission, and the Virginia Association of Municipal Wastewater Agencies. All individuals serving on the peer review team shall have previous training and experience in preparing applications for permits issued under the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Permit program or the air permitting program. The consulting firm shall be selected by agreement between the Director of DEQ and the peer review team members from the previously mentioned organizations and in accordance with the Virginia Procurement Act. The review shall be completed and a written report containing findings and recommendations for the implementation of any practices, procedures or other steps necessary to increase the efficiency of DEQ shall be forwarded to the members of the peer review team by September 15, 2006. The report shall include information, to the extent available, on whether or not the recommendations would change the level of environmental protection, the estimated savings to DEQ and the regulated community, and any barriers to implementation. The report and DEQ’s responses and plans for implementation of such recommendations shall be forwarded to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance by October 15, 2006.

“5. That a review of DEQ’s solid waste permitting and inspection programs shall be conducted in order to ensure that those programs provide maximum efficiency consistent with protection of the environment and public health. The review shall be conducted by DEQ with the active participation of persons qualified by training and experience in the management and operation of solid waste facilities, who shall be recommended by the Virginia Waste Industries Association, the Solid Waste Association of North America and the Southwest Virginia Solid Waste Management Association. The review shall be completed and a written report containing findings and recommendations for the implementation of any practices, procedures or other steps necessary to increase the efficiency of DEQ shall be forwarded to the members of the peer review team by September 15, 2006. The report shall include information, to the extent available, on whether or not the recommendations would change the level of environmental protection, the estimated savings to DEQ and the regulated community, and any barriers to implementation. The report and DEQ’s responses and plans for implementation of such recommendations shall be forwarded to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance by October 15, 2006.

“6. That in order to accomplish the intent of the General Assembly, DEQ shall:

“a. Implement a streamlined permit application to be used for renewals of previously granted environmental permits where there has been no significant change in the permitted activity or applicable statutory or regulatory requirements during the previous permit term. Such streamlined permit renewal application shall be designed, to the extent not prohibited by federal law or regulation, to avoid the submission and duplication of information that has previously been submitted by the applicant and achieve maximum efficiency and economy for both the permittee and DEQ, and DEQ shall work with the peer review team to develop these applications with the goal of minimizing the amount of duplicate, costly work on the part of the permit renewal applicants and DEQ;

“b. Expeditiously implement electronic permitting, filing and reporting procedures so as to improve access to information, reduce the costs of compliance, and reduce costs to DEQ;

“c. Explore ways to reduce compliance costs to the permittee and reduce DEQ’s oversight costs for ensuring compliance. The options to be explored shall include, but not be limited to, increased utilization of certified evaluations (i.e., by professional engineers) as a method of ensuring compliance while reducing the need for physical inspections; and

“d. Encourage efficient and effective environmental performance by deeming a facility’s demonstration of a proven environmental management system, such as ISO 14001, along with a commitment to pollution prevention, annual progress reporting, and a record of sustained compliance as meeting the criteria for acceptance into DEQ’s programs for environmental excellence.

“7. That if general fund revenues in excess of $500,000 per year over the Governor’s submitted budget for natural resources for the 2004-2006 biennium are appropriated by the 2004 Appropriation Act and are allocated for implementation of the water permit programs, the water permit fees set forth in or established pursuant to this act shall be reduced by a pro rata basis.” No appropriation over and above was made; therefore there will be no fee reduction.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 822 substituted “subdivisions 15 and 16” for “subdivision 16” in the introductory language and in subdivision 4; substituted “that” for “which” in the introductory language; and added subdivision 6. For expiration of this amendment, see Editor’s note.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 249 and 324 are identical, and substituted “subdivisions 15 and” for “subdivision” in the introductory paragraph; added the second through last sentences in subdivision 1; substituted “subdivisions 15 or” for “subdivision” in subdivision 4; in subdivision 5, in the first sentence, inserted the clause (i) designation and “and maintaining” and added clause (ii) at the end; and made a minor stylistic change.

Law Review.

For article surveying changes in environmental law in Virginia from June 2001 to June 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 117 (2002).

§ 10.1-1402.1:1.
Annual fees for nonhazardous solid waste management facilities.

In addition to the permit fees assessed and collected pursuant to §

10.1-1402.1

, the Board shall collect an annual fee from any person operating a sanitary landfill or other facility permitted under this chapter for the disposal, storage, or treatment of nonhazardous solid waste. The fees shall be exempt from statewide indirect cost charged and assessed by the Department of Accounts. Annual fees shall reflect the time and complexity of inspecting and monitoring the different categories of facilities. Any annual fee that is based on volume shall be calculated using the tonnage reported by each facility pursuant to §

10.1-1413.1

for the preceding year, and shall be adjusted annually by the Consumer Price Index. The annual fee shall be assessed as follows:

Sanitary landfills, noncaptive industrial landfills, and construction and demolition debris landfills shall be assessed an annual fee of $0.115 per ton.

Incinerators and energy recovery facilities shall be assessed an annual fee of $0.055 per ton.Ash generated by incinerators and energy recovery facilities that are subject to this section shall be exempted from the annual fees assessed under this section.

Other types of facilities shall be assessed an annual fee as follows:

Click to view

The Board shall by regulation prescribe the manner and schedule for remitting fees imposed by this section and may allow for the quarterly payment of any such fees.

The regulation shall include provisions allowing the Director to waive or reduce fees assessed during a state of emergency or for waste resulting from emergency response actions.

The Board may promulgate regulations establishing a schedule of reduced permit fees for facilities that have established a record of compliance with the terms and requirements of their permits and shall establish criteria, by regulation, to provide for reductions in the annual fee amount assessed for facilities based upon acceptance into the Department’s programs to recognize excellent environmental performance.

The operator of a facility owned by a private entity and subject to any fee imposed pursuant to this section shall collect such fee as a surcharge on any fee schedule established pursuant to law, ordinance, resolution or contract for solid waste processing or disposal operations at the facility.

Composting
$1,200 Regulated medical waste
$2,500 Materials recovery
$4,500 Transfer station
$5,500 Facilities in post- closure care
$1,000 The annual fee for active captive landfills shall be as follows: Small landfills (landfilling less than 100,000 tons per year) $2,500 Large landfills (landfilling 100,000 tons or more per year) $7,500

History.

2004, cc. 249, 324; 2011, c. 420.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 249 and 324, cls. 3 through 7 provide:

“3. That the regulations adopted by the State Air Pollution Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board, and the State Water Control Board to initially implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia and shall become effective upon filing with the Registrar of Regulations. Thereafter, any amendments to the fee schedule shall not be exempted from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.).

“4. That it is the General Assembly’s intent that the Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) shall evaluate and implement measures to improve the long-term effectiveness and efficiency of its programs in ensuring the Commonwealth’s air quality, water quality and land resources are protected and to ensure the maximum value from the funding provided for the Commonwealth’s environmental programs. To assist DEQ in accomplishing such goals, a management efficiency peer review shall be conducted of the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit programs and the air permit program implemented by the agency. The review shall evaluate (i) operational changes that would improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the agency’s operations, (ii) ways to reduce the costs of compliance, and (iii) the adequacy and appropriateness of staffing levels to meet state and federal requirements. The review shall be led by a consulting firm with expertise and previous experience in conducting similar reviews of state agencies and private firms and shall include a peer review team appointed by the Director of DEQ, consisting of individuals familiar with the permit program including, but not limited to, persons nominated by the Virginia Association of Counties, the Virginia Chemistry Council, the Virginia Manufacturers Association, the Virginia Municipal League, the Hampton Roads Planning District Commission, and the Virginia Association of Municipal Wastewater Agencies. All individuals serving on the peer review team shall have previous training and experience in preparing applications for permits issued under the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Permit program or the air permitting program. The consulting firm shall be selected by agreement between the Director of DEQ and the peer review team members from the previously mentioned organizations and in accordance with the Virginia Procurement Act. The review shall be completed and a written report containing findings and recommendations for the implementation of any practices, procedures or other steps necessary to increase the efficiency of DEQ shall be forwarded to the members of the peer review team by September 15, 2006. The report shall include information, to the extent available, on whether or not the recommendations would change the level of environmental protection, the estimated savings to DEQ and the regulated community, and any barriers to implementation. The report and DEQ’s responses and plans for implementation of such recommendations shall be forwarded to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance by October 15, 2006.

“5. That a review of DEQ’s solid waste permitting and inspection programs shall be conducted in order to ensure that those programs provide maximum efficiency consistent with protection of the environment and public health. The review shall be conducted by DEQ with the active participation of persons qualified by training and experience in the management and operation of solid waste facilities, who shall be recommended by the Virginia Waste Industries Association, the Solid Waste Association of North America and the Southwest Virginia Solid Waste Management Association. The review shall be completed and a written report containing findings and recommendations for the implementation of any practices, procedures or other steps necessary to increase the efficiency of DEQ shall be forwarded to the members of the peer review team by September 15, 2006. The report shall include information, to the extent available, on whether or not the recommendations would change the level of environmental protection, the estimated savings to DEQ and the regulated community, and any barriers to implementation. The report and DEQ’s responses and plans for implementation of such recommendations shall be forwarded to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance by October 15, 2006.

“6. That in order to accomplish the intent of the General Assembly, DEQ shall:

“a. Implement a streamlined permit application to be used for renewals of previously granted environmental permits where there has been no significant change in the permitted activity or applicable statutory or regulatory requirements during the previous permit term. Such streamlined permit renewal application shall be designed, to the extent not prohibited by federal law or regulation, to avoid the submission and duplication of information that has previously been submitted by the applicant and achieve maximum efficiency and economy for both the permittee and DEQ, and DEQ shall work with the peer review team to develop these applications with the goal of minimizing the amount of duplicate, costly work on the part of the permit renewal applicants and DEQ;

“b. Expeditiously implement electronic permitting, filing and reporting procedures so as to improve access to information, reduce the costs of compliance, and reduce costs to DEQ;

“c. Explore ways to reduce compliance costs to the permittee and reduce DEQ’s oversight costs for ensuring compliance. The options to be explored shall include, but not be limited to, increased utilization of certified evaluations (i.e., by professional engineers) as a method of ensuring compliance while reducing the need for physical inspections; and

“d. Encourage efficient and effective environmental performance by deeming a facility’s demonstration of a proven environmental management system, such as ISO 14001, along with a commitment to pollution prevention, annual progress reporting, and a record of sustained compliance as meeting the criteria for acceptance into DEQ’s programs for environmental excellence.

“7. That if general fund revenues in excess of $500,000 per year over the Governor’s submitted budget for natural resources for the 2004-2006 biennium are appropriated by the 2004 Appropriation Act and are allocated for implementation of the water permit programs, the water permit fees set forth in or established pursuant to this act shall be reduced by a pro rata basis.” No appropriation over and above was made; therefore there will be no fee reduction.

Acts 2011, c. 420, cl. 2, provides: “That the Department of Environmental Quality shall continue its efforts to improve its solid waste program and submit a report to the General Assembly regarding such efforts by December 1, 2011.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 275, cl. 2, § 1 provides: “That the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality (the Director), or his designee, shall convene a working group for the purpose of developing an annual fee schedule for nonhazardous solid waste management facilities to replace the current annual fee schedule set forth in §

10.1-1402.1:1

of the Code of Virginia. The working group shall include representatives of (i) private sector companies that own or operate nonhazardous waste solid waste management facilities, (ii) local governments that own or operate nonhazardous solid waste management facilities, (iii) public service authorities and waste management authorities, (iv) an environmental organization, and (v) any other parties that the Director determines would assist the group in its deliberations. The Director, or his designee, shall preside over the group and shall make Department of Environment Quality (the Department) staff available as necessary to assist and support the group in its deliberations. The working group shall convene no later than August 1, 2021, and shall meet as necessary thereafter. The Department shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly by December 1, 2021, a summary of the working group’s discussions and recommendations for a schedule of annual fees to replace the schedule in §

10.1-1402.1:1

of the Code of Virginia that shall, at a minimum, be sufficient to reflect the direct costs of permitting, compliance, inspection, monitoring, training, and enforcement as set forth in the Department’s budget for the nonhazardous solid waste management program when aggregated and combined with the permit fees assessed and collected pursuant to §

10.1-1402.1

of the Code of Virginia.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 420, in the first paragraph in subsection A, added “and shall be adjusted annually by the Consumer Price Index” in the next-to-last sentence; rewrote subdivisions A 1 through A 5, in part by deleting subdivisions A 1 and A 2, which read: “Noncaptive industrial landfills” and “Construction and demolition debris landfills,” respectively, redesignating the remaining subdivisions accordingly, standardizing the fees in subdivisions A 1 and A 2, and increasing the fees in subdivision A 3; and in subsection B, deleted the last two sentences, which read: “The payment of any annual fee amounts owed shall be deferred until January 1, 2005, if the person subject to those fees submits a written request to the Department prior to October 1, 2004. The selection of this deferred payment option shall not reduce the amount owed.”

§ 10.1-1402.2.
Permit Program Fund established; use of moneys.

There is hereby established a special, nonreverting fund in the state treasury to be known as the Virginia Waste Management Board Permit Program Fund, hereafter referred to as the Fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 2.2-1802, all moneys collected pursuant to subdivision 16 of §

10.1-1402

shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Fund.

Any moneys remaining in the Fund shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such moneys shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it.

The Board is authorized and empowered to release moneys from the Fund, on warrants issued by the State Comptroller, for the purposes of recovering portions of the costs of processing applications under subdivision 16 of §

10.1-1402

under the direction of the Director.

An accounting of moneys received by and distributed from the Fund shall be kept by the State Comptroller and furnished upon request to the Governor or the General Assembly.

History.

1992, c. 853.

§ 10.1-1402.3.
Conformance with federal requirements.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this article, any fee system developed by the Board may be modified by regulation promulgated by the Board, as may be necessary to conform with the requirements of federal acts and any regulations promulgated thereunder.
Any modification imposed under this section shall be submitted to the members of the Senate Committees on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and on Finance and Appropriations; and the House Committees on Appropriations, Conservation and Natural Resources, and Finance.

History.

1992, c. 853.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committees on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committees on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and Finance.” March 10, 2021.

§ 10.1-1403.
Advisory committees.

The Governor shall appoint such advisory committees as he may deem necessary to aid in the development of an effective waste management program.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-267; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1404.
Department continued; general powers.

The Department of Waste Management is continued. The Department shall be headed by a Director, who shall be appointed by the Governor to serve at his pleasure for a term coincident with his own or until a successor shall be appointed and qualified.

In addition to the powers designated elsewhere in this chapter, the Department shall have the power to:

Administer the policies and regulations established by the Board pursuant to this chapter;

Employ such personnel as may be required to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter, including, but not limited to, contracts with the United States, other state agencies and governmental subdivisions of the Commonwealth; and

Provide upon request and without charge, technical assistance to local governing bodies regarding stockpiling of tires pursuant to its authority in this chapter to promote resource conservation and resource recovery systems. The governing body of any county, city or town may adopt an ordinance regulating the stockpiling of tires, including but not limited to, the location of such stockpiles and the number of tires to be deposited at the site.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-268; 1988, c. 891.

Cross references.

As to the creation of the Department of Environmental Quality and the consolidation of the Department of Waste Management into that department, see §

10.1-1183

.